Florida, session 2026, SB610.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 22 23 Section 1.âSection 515.27, Florida Statutes, is amended to 24 read: 25 515.27âResidential swimming pool safety feature options; 26 penalties.â 27 (1)âIn order to pass final inspection and receive a 28 certificate of completion, a residential swimming pool must meet 29 at least one of the following requirements relating to pool 30 safety features: 31 (a)âThe pool must be isolated from access to a home by an 32 enclosure that meets the pool barrier requirements of s. 515.29; 33 (b)âThe pool must be equipped with an approved safety pool 34 cover; 35 (c)âAll doors and windows providing direct access from the 36 home to the pool must be equipped with an exit alarm that has a 37 minimum sound pressure rating of 85 dB A at 10 feet; 38 (d)âAll doors providing direct access from the home to the 39 pool must be equipped with a self-closing, self-latching device 40 with a release mechanism placed no lower than 54 inches above 41 the floor; or 42 (e)âA swimming pool alarm that, when placed in a pool, 43 sounds an alarm upon detection of an accidental or unauthorized 44 entrance into the water. Such pool alarm must meet and be 45 independently certified to ASTM Standard F2208, titled âStandard 46 Safety Specification for Residential Pool Alarms,â which 47 includes surface motion, pressure, sonar, laser, and infrared 48 alarms. For purposes of this paragraph, the term âswimming pool 49 alarmâ does not include any swimming protection alarm device 50 designed for individual use, such as an alarm attached to a 51 child that sounds when the child exceeds a certain distance or 52 becomes submerged in water. 53 (2)âA swimming pool, regardless of the year in which it was 54 built, located on residential real property that is transferred 55 or sold on or after October 1, 2026, must be equipped with at 56 least one pool safety feature as required in subsection (1). A 57 seller of such residential real property shall disclose to the 58 prospective buyer whether the pool is equipped with at least one 59 pool safety feature as required in subsection (1) before the 60 transfer or sale. If the pool safety feature is the pool 61 barrier, it must meet all of the requirements in s. 515.29. 62 (3)(2)âA person who fails to equip a new residential 63 swimming pool with at least one pool safety feature as required 64 in subsection (1) or subsection (2) commits a misdemeanor of the 65 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 66 775.083, except that no penalty shall be imposed if the person, 67 within 45 days after arrest or issuance of a summons or a notice 68 to appear, has equipped the pool with at least one safety 69 feature as required in subsection (1) or subsection (2) and has 70 attended a drowning prevention education program established by 71 s. 515.31. However, the requirement of attending a drowning 72 prevention education program is waived if such program is not 73 offered within 45 days after issuance of the citation. 74 (4)âThis section may not be construed to prevent a local 75 government from imposing additional reporting requirements to 76 those specified in this section. 77 Section 2.âSubsections (6) and (7) are added to section 78 515.29, Florida Statutes, and subsection (1) of that section is 79 republished, to read: 80 515.29âResidential swimming pool barrier requirements.â 81 (1)âA residential swimming pool barrier must have all of 82 the following characteristics: 83 (a)âThe barrier must be at least 4 feet high on the 84 outside. 85 (b)âThe barrier may not have any gaps, openings, 86 indentations, protrusions, or structural components that could 87 allow a young child to crawl under, squeeze through, or climb 88 over the barrier. 89 (c)âThe barrier must be placed around the perimeter of the 90 pool and must be separate from any fence, wall, or other 91 enclosure surrounding the yard unless the fence, wall, or other 92 enclosure or portion thereof is situated on the perimeter of the 93 pool, is being used as part of the barrier, and meets the 94 barrier requirements of this section. 95 (d)âThe barrier must be placed sufficiently away from the 96 waterâs edge to prevent a young child or medically frail elderly 97 person who may have managed to penetrate the barrier from 98 immediately falling into the water. 99 (6)âA swimming pool, regardless of the year in which it was 100 built, located on residential real property that is transferred 101 or sold on or after October 1, 2026, must meet all of the pool 102 barrier requirements in subsection (1). A seller of such 103 residential real property shall disclose to the prospective 104 buyer whether the pool meets all of the pool barrier 105 requirements in subsection (1) before the transfer or sale. 106 (7)âThis section may not be construed to prevent a local 107 government from imposing additional reporting requirements to 108 those specified in this section. 109 Section 3.âSubsection (1) of section 515.31, Florida 110 Statutes, is amended to read: 111 515.31âDrowning prevention education program; public 112 information publication.â 113 (1)âThe department shall develop a drowning prevention 114 education program. Such program must, which shall be made 115 available to the public at the state and local levels and is 116 which shall be required as set forth in s. 515.27(3) s. 117 515.27(2) for persons in violation of the pool safety 118 requirements of this chapter. The department may charge a fee, 119 not to exceed $100, for attendance at such a program. The 120 drowning prevention education program shall be funded using fee 121 proceeds, state funds appropriated for such purpose, and grants. 122 The department, in lieu of developing its own program, may adopt 123 a nationally recognized drowning prevention education program to 124 be approved for use in local safety education programs, as 125 provided in rule of the department. 126 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.